Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.020

Constitutional measures—Ballot title—Formulation, ballot display, certification.

(1) When a proposed constitutional amendment is to be submitted to the people of the state for statewide popular vote, the ballot title consists of: (a) A statement of the subject of the amendment; (b) a concise description of the amendment; and (c) a question in the form prescribed in this section. The statement of the subject of a constitutional amendment must be sufficiently broad to reflect the nature of the amendment, sufficiently precise to give notice of the amendment's subject matter, and not exceed ten words. The concise description must contain no more than thirty words, give a true and impartial description of the amendment's essential contents, clearly identify the amendment to be voted on, and not, to the extent reasonably possible, create prejudice either for or against the amendment.

The ballot title for a proposed constitutional amendment must be displayed on the ballot substantially as follows:

"The legislature has proposed a constitutional amendment on (statement of subject). This amendment would (concise description). Should this constitutional amendment be:

Approved . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □

Rejected . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

(2) When a proposed new constitution is submitted to the people of the state by a constitutional convention for statewide popular vote, the ballot title consists of: (a) A concise description of the new constitution; and (b) a question in the form prescribed in this section. The concise description must contain no more than thirty words, give a true and impartial description of the new constitution's essential contents, clearly identify the proposed constitution to be voted on, and not, to the extent reasonably possible, create prejudice either for or against the new constitution.

The ballot title for a proposed new constitution must be displayed on the ballot substantially as follows:

"The constitutional convention approved a new proposed state constitution that (concise description). Should this proposed constitution be:

Approved . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □

Rejected . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

(3) The legislature may specify the statement of subject or concise description, or both, in a constitutional amendment that it submits to the people. If the legislature fails to specify the statement of subject or concise description, or both, the attorney general shall prepare the material that was not specified. The statement of subject and concise description as so provided must be included as part of the ballot title unless changed on appeal.

The attorney general shall specify the concise description for a proposed new constitution that is submitted to the people by a constitutional convention, and the concise description as so provided must be included as part of the ballot title unless changed on appeal.

(4) The secretary of state shall certify to the county auditors the ballot title for a proposed constitution, constitutional amendment, or other statewide question at the same time and in the same manner as the ballot titles to initiatives and referendums.

[ 2003 c 111 s 902. Prior: 2000 c 197 s 7. Formerly RCW 29.27.057.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2000 c 197: See note following RCW 29A.72.050.